Washington statutes.
RCW 18.04.185

Application for license—Secretary of state agent for service of process.

Application for a license to practice public accounting in this state by a certified public accountant or CPA firm who holds a license or permit to practice issued by another state constitutes the appointment of the secretary of state as an agent for service of process in any action or proceeding against the applicant arising from any transaction or operation connected with or incidental to the practice of public accounting in this state by the holder of the license to practice.

[ 2001 c 294 s 10; 1999 c 378 s 4; 1986 c 295 s 7; 1983 c 234 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 294: See note following RCW 18.04.015.